Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,158
Merger of districts; special election; notice.

Not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days after the designation of the plan as the final approved plan, the proposition of the adoption or rejection of such proposed plan of merger shall be submitted by the boards of directors at a special election to all the electors of the irrigation districts which will be affected by the merger plan. Notice of such election shall be given by posting a notice in three public places in each election precinct in each district affected by the merger for at least twenty days, and also by publication of such notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the office of the board of directors of each district affected by the merger is required to be kept once a week for three successive weeks.

Laws 1972, LB 1509, § 6.